Utah statutes.
4-20-1.   Title -- Definitions.
(1)  This chapter is known as the "Rangeland Improvement Act."
(2)  As used in this chapter:
(a)  "Cooperative weed management association" means a multigovernmental
association cooperating together to control noxious weeds in a geographic area
that includes some portion of Utah.
(b)  "Fees" mean the revenue collected by the United States Secretary of
Interior from assessments on livestock using public lands.
(c)  "Grazing district" means an administrative unit of land:
(i)  designated by the commissioner as being valuable for grazing and for
raising forage crops; and
(ii)  which consists of any combination of the following:
(A)  public land;
(B)  private land;
(C)  state land; and
(D)  school and institutional trust land as defined in Section 53C-1-103.
(d)  "Public lands" mean vacant, unappropriated, reserved, and unreserved
federal lands.
(e)  "Regional board" means a regional grazing advisory board whose members
are appointed under Section 4-20-1.6.
(f) "Restricted account" means the Rangeland Improvement Account created in
Section 4-20-2.
(g)  "Sales" or "leases" mean the sale or lease, respectively, of isolated or
disconnected tracts of public lands by the United States Secretary of
Interior.
(h)  "State board" means the State Grazing Advisory Board created under
Section 4-20-1.5.
